District of Columbia statutes.
15-719

Adoption court costs and fees.

Any person who files a petition pursuant to Chapter 3 of Title 16 to adopt a child who is a respondent in a neglect proceeding or who has been adjudicated to be neglected as defined in Chapter 23 of Title 16 shall not be required to pay court costs or fees in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Apr. 4, 2001, D.C. Law 13-273, § 2(c), 48 DCR 1637

History

Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 13-208 added this section.
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 13-208 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary Addition of Section

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, November 29, 2000, 48 DCR 63).
For temporary (90 day) addition of § 15-719, see § 2(b) of the Foster Children’s Guardianship Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-490, December 18, 2000, 48 DCR 45).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of Foster Children’s Guardianship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-4, February 13, 2001, 48 DCR 2254).

Emergency Legislation